test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-41tuekk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tükk: # Noun (41) tükk 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     tükk+N+Sg+Nom: tükk
     tükk+N+Sg+Gen: tükü
     tükk+N+Sg+Par: tükkü
     tükk+N+Sg+Ill: tükkü
     tükk+N+Sg+Ine: tükün
     tükk+N+Sg+Ela: tüküst
     tükk+N+Sg+All: tüküle
     tükk+N+Sg+Ade: tükül
     tükk+N+Sg+Abl: tükült
     tükk+N+Sg+Tra: tüküs
     tükk+N+Sg+Ter: tüküniq
     tükk+N+Sg+Abe: tüküldäq
     tükk+N+Sg+Com: tükügaq
     tükk+N+Pl+Nom: tüküq
     tükk+N+Pl+Gen: tükke
     tükk+N+Pl+Par: tükke
     tükk+N+Pl+Ill: tükkehe
     tükk+N+Pl+Ine: tüken
     tükk+N+Pl+Ela: tükest
     tükk+N+Pl+All: tükele
     tükk+N+Pl+Ade: tükel
     tükk+N+Pl+Abl: tükelt
     tükk+N+Pl+Tra: tükes
     tükk+N+Pl+Ter: tükeniq
     tükk+N+Pl+Abe: tükeldäq
     tükk+N+Pl+Com: tükkegaq
